Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4630.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) When an individual desires to keep the exact date of his or her the individual's marriage to an another individual of the opposite sex a secret, the probate judge may issue, without publicity, a marriage license to any individual making application, under oath, if there is good reason expressed in the application and determined to be sufficient by the probate judge. (2) The probate judge may authorize an order nunc pro tunc regarding the date to appear on the marriage license. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.